Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(2) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's designee.

(3) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or public entity and every officer, agent, or employee of these entities.

(4) "Plant pests" means, but is not limited to, any living stage of any insects, mites, nematodes, slugs, snails, protozoa, or other invertebrate animals, bacteria, fungi, other parasitic plants or weeds or reproductive parts thereof, viruses or any organisms similar to or allied with any of the foregoing, or any infectious substance, which can directly or indirectly injure or cause disease or damage to any plant or parts thereof, or any processed, manufactured, or other products of plants.

(5) "Micropropagated plants" means plants propagated using aseptic laboratory techniques and an artificial culture medium.

(6) "Tolerance" means the maximum acceptable percentage of planting stock that is diseased, infected by plant pests, defective, or off-type based on visual inspection or laboratory testing by the director or other authorized person.

(7) "Planting stock" includes any plant material used in the propagation of horticultural, floricultural, viticultural, or olericultural plants for the purpose of being sold, offered for sale, or distributed for planting or reproduction purposes.

(8) "Breeder planting stock" means plant propagating materials directly controlled by the originating or sponsoring plant breeder or institution, which provides the source of foundation planting stock.

(9) "Foundation planting stock" means planting stock that has been so handled as to maintain genetic characteristics and that has been:

(a) Increased directly from breeder planting stock; or

(b) Designated as foundation planting stock by the director.

(10) "Registered planting stock" means planting stock of a quality suitable for the production of certified planting stock that has been so handled as to maintain genetic characteristics and that is:

(a) Increased directly from foundation or registered planting stock; or

(b) Designated as registered planting stock by the director.

(11) "Certified planting stock" means the progeny of foundation, registered, or certified planting stock that has been so handled as to maintain genetic characteristics, that has met certification standards authorized by this chapter, and that has been certified by the director.

[ 1999 c 144 s 1; 1989 c 354 s 84; 1983 c 3 s 19; 1961 c 83 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 354 ss 70-81 and 84-86: See note following RCW 15.49.005.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.